Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201781-2107
Electrical contractor license; applicant; qualifications; Class B electrical contractor license and Class B master electrician license; restriction on license.

(1) An applicant for an electrical contractor license shall (a) be a graduate of a four-year electrical course in an accredited college or university, (b) have at least one year's experience, acceptable to the board, as a journeyman electrician, or (c) have at least five years' experience, acceptable to the board, in planning for, laying out, supervising, and installing wiring, apparatus, or equipment for electrical light, heat, and power.

(2) A Class B electrical contractor license and a Class B master electrician license shall be valid only in regard to systems of not over four hundred amperes in capacity in structures used and maintained as residential dwellings but not larger than four-family dwellings located in any municipality which has a population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 9;

Laws 1978, LB 833, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 81-578;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 126, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 61.